North Carolina, session 2025, SB98.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in recurring funds for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be allocated to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.,
for Dolly Parton's Imagination Library, an early literacy program that mails age-appropriate
books to registered children on a monthly basis.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S98-v-1*